Hawaii statutes.
§383-29.8 Partial unemployment; waivers.
(a) The registration for work requirements under section 383-29(a) shall be
waived for individuals who are partially unemployed, as defined in section
383-1.

(b) An individual shall be exempted from the
work search requirements as determined by rules of the department, or be
subject to modified work search requirements as authorized by the department if
the individual is waived from the registration for work requirements, as
defined in section 383-1. [L 2009, c 170, pt of §2, §7; am L 2010, c 76, §3; am
L 2011, c 165, §§4, 5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next